src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjective inflection
!  --------------------
!! The Viena Karelian language adjectives compare.

LEXICON adjective
+A: # ;
LEXICON adjective_dem
+A: # ;
LEXICON adjective_kar
+A: # ;
LEXICON adjective_kielt
+A: # ;
LEXICON adjective_komp
+A+Cmp: # ;
LEXICON adjective_mod
+A: # ;
LEXICON adjective_sup
+A+Sup: # ;
LEXICON adjective_taipum
+A: # ;
LEXICON adjective_vahv
+A: # ;
LEXICON adjective_vaill
+A: # ;

LEXICON ADJ_SGNOM_0

+Sg+Nom:0 # ;

!LEXICON ADJ_PLPAR_I
!
!+Pl+Par:i  # ;

LEXICON ADJ_PLPAR_JA

+Pl+Par:ja  # ;


LEXICON ADJ_PLPAR_IE

+Pl+Par:ie  # ;

LEXICON ADJ_PLGEN_IEN

+Pl+Gen:ien  # ;

LEXICON ADJ_SGPAR_A

+Sg+Par:a  # ;

LEXICON ADJ_SGPAR_Ä

+Sg+Par:ä  # ;


LEXICON ADJ_SGPAR_TA

+Sg+Par:ta  # ;

LEXICON ADJ_SGPAR_TÄ

+Sg+Par:tä  # ;

LEXICON ADJ_SGPAR_TU

+Sg+Par:tu  # ;

LEXICON ADJ_SGPAR_TY

+Sg+Par:ty  # ;

LEXICON ADJ_CASES_SG_BACK

0  ADJ_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0  ADJ_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK ;

LEXICON ADJ_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK

+Sg+Ess:na # ;
+Sg+Ill:h # ;

LEXICON ADJ_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK

+Sg+Ine:šša # ;
+Sg+Ela:šta # ;
+Sg+Ade:lla # ;
+Sg+Gen:n # ;
+Pl+Nom:t # ;
+Sg+Tra:kši # ;

LEXICON ADJ_CASES_SG_FRONT

0  ADJ_CASES_SG_WEAK_FRONT ;
0  ADJ_CASES_SG_STRONG_FRONT ;

LEXICON ADJ_CASES_SG_STRONG_FRONT

+Sg+Ess:nä # ;
+Sg+Ill:h # ;

LEXICON ADJ_CASES_SG_WEAK_FRONT

+Sg+Ine:ššä # ;
+Sg+Ela:štä # ;
+Sg+Ade:llä # ;
+Sg+Gen:n # ;
+Pl+Nom:t # ;
+Sg+Tra:kši # ;


LEXICON ADJ_CASES_PL_BACK

0  ADJ_CASES_PL_WEAK_BACK ;
0  ADJ_CASES_PL_STRONG_BACK ;

LEXICON ADJ_CASES_PL_STRONG_BACK

+Pl+Ess:ina # ;

LEXICON ADJ_CASES_PL_WEAK_BACK

+Pl+Par:i # ;
+Pl+Ade:illa # ;
+Pl+Ine:išša # ;!Should this be issa, since the i is present? Jaska 2024-09-24
+Pl+Ine:išta # ;!Should this be ista, since the i is present? Jaska 2024-09-24
+Pl+Gen:ien # ;

LEXICON ADJ_CASES_PL_FRONT

0  ADJ_CASES_PL_STRONG_FRONT ;
0  ADJ_CASES_PL_WEAK_FRONT ;

LEXICON ADJ_CASES_PL_STRONG_FRONT

+Pl+Ess:inä # ;

LEXICON ADJ_CASES_PL_WEAK_FRONT

+Pl+Par:i # ;
+Pl+Ade:illä # ;
+Pl+Ine:issä # ;!Bible
+Pl+Ela:istä # ;!Bible
+Pl+Ine:iššä # ;!Should this be issä, since the i is present? Jaska 2024-09-24
+Pl+Ela:ištä # ;!Should this be istä, since the i is present? Jaska 2024-09-24
+Pl+Gen:ien # ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
