src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjectives
aijahko	adjective_mod ;
aika	adjective_taipum ;
aino	adjective_taipum ;
ainohut	adjective_dem ;
ainovaine	adjective_dem ;
alavahuine	adjective_mod ;
alavaine	adjective_dem ;
alempi	adjective_komp ;
alimmaine	adjective_sup ;
ampumatoin	adjective_kielt ;
apakkoine	adjective ;
armahatoin	adjective_kar ;
aspo	adjective_taipum ;
avavumatoin	adjective_kielt ;
elävättävä	adjective_mod ;
emätöin	adjective_kar ;
ensi	adjective_taipum ;
entohitoin	adjective_kar ;
etimäine	adjective_sup ;
eto	adjective_taipum ;
ettšimätöin	adjective_kielt ;
eänevä	adjective ;
hajutoin	adjective_kar ;
happanematoin	adjective_kielt ;
harskiempaine	adjective_komp ;
hausakka	adjective_mod ;
heittelijä	adjective ;
helmetöin	adjective_kar ;
helppoine	adjective_dem ;
hentoine	adjective_dem ;
hiekaksine	adjective_mod ;
hiematoin	adjective_kar ;
hienoine	adjective_dem ;
hienyt	adjective_dem ;
hitaisa	adjective ;
hitvakkaine	adjective_dem ;
hivomatoin	adjective_kielt ;
hoaliene	adjective_dem ;
hoikahko	adjective_mod ;
homehetoin	adjective_kar ;
huikelahko	adjective_mod ;
huonohkoine	adjective_dem ;
huorahko	adjective_mod ;
huosokas	adjective ;
huosotoin	adjective_kar ;
hupaine	adjective_dem ;
hyvähköine	adjective_dem ;
hyväkäs	adjective_mod ;
hyyräkkäine	adjective_dem ;
häträkkäine	adjective_dem ;
hätvie	adjective ;
hörötöin	adjective_kar ;
ikävättšäine	adjective_mod ;
illaistamatoin	adjective_kielt ;
ilvietöin	adjective_kar ;
issukas	adjective ;
jakamatoin	adjective_kielt ;
jatkotoin	adjective_kar ;
julkiehko	adjective_mod ;
jumakka	adjective ;
juomatoin	adjective_kielt ;
jyriempäine	adjective_komp ;
jyrkättävä	adjective_mod ;
jälempäine	adjective_komp ;
järiene	adjective_dem ;
järiäine	adjective ;
jäsenetöin	adjective_kar ;
jäsmäkempäine	adjective_komp ;
jäsäkähkö	adjective_mod ;
kammelattava	adjective_mod ;
kantikas	adjective ;
kapelaine	adjective_dem ;
karmiempaine	adjective_komp ;
kasvamatoin	adjective_kielt ;
katalaine	adjective_dem ;
kattšomatoin	adjective_kielt ;
kehiehköine	adjective_mod ;
kehätöin	adjective_kar ;
kelikkö	adjective ;
kelpo	adjective_taipum ;
keyhempäine	adjective_komp ;
kieroine	adjective_dem ;
kierättävä	adjective_mod ;
kiimatoin	adjective_kar ;
kiistoisa	adjective ;
kipperämpäine	adjective_komp ;
kitšmeräine	adjective_dem ;
kivittšy	adjective ;
kohentamatoin	adjective_kielt ;
kohtu	adjective_taipum ;
kohurattšaine	adjective_mod ;
kolkkimaine	adjective_sup ;
kolo	adjective ;
konnutoin	adjective_kar ;
kopoine	adjective_vahv ;
korkiempaine	adjective_komp ;
kosinaine	adjective_dem ;
kotihine	adjective ;
kouhakahko	adjective_mod ;
koveraine	adjective_dem ;
kroassimatoin	adjective_kielt ;
krätšiškö	adjective ;
kujotoin	adjective_kar ;
kulottava	adjective_mod ;
kupoine	adjective_vahv ;
kurvakas	adjective ;
kuttšumatoin	adjective_kielt ;
kutuine	adjective_vahv ;
kuuloine	adjective_vahv ;
kuutoin	adjective_kar ;
kykenemätöin	adjective_kielt ;
kylempäine	adjective_komp ;
kyppyräksine	adjective_mod ;
kytšišköine	adjective_dem ;
käiverä	adjective ;
kävelemätöin	adjective_kielt ;
laitimaine	adjective_sup ;
laivie	adjective ;
lampahatoin	adjective_kar ;
lattšuine	adjective_dem ;
latvimaine	adjective_sup ;
lauhakempaine	adjective_komp ;
lehtimäine	adjective_sup ;
leiväkempäine	adjective_komp ;
leppimätöin	adjective_kielt ;
levelähkö	adjective_mod ;
liennäkempäine	adjective_komp ;
lietšakko	adjective ;
lihatoin	adjective_kar ;
lihavaine	adjective_dem ;
liijempi	adjective_komp ;
liusumpaine	adjective_komp ;
loakkiene	adjective_dem ;
loitimaine	adjective_sup ;
loitompi	adjective_komp ;
loppematoin	adjective_kielt ;
losiehkoine	adjective_mod ;
lotorkka	adjective ;
lukematoin	adjective_kielt ;
luonnotoin	adjective_kar ;
lyhempäine	adjective_komp ;
lyhyine	adjective_dem ;
lähettävä	adjective_mod ;
lähimäine	adjective_sup ;
läitö	adjective_taipum ;
lämmempäine	adjective_komp ;
lämmittämätöin	adjective_kielt ;
lämpimäine	adjective_dem ;
lämäkkäine	adjective ;
maijotoin	adjective_kar ;
matkoamatoin	adjective_kielt ;
meijätöin	adjective_kar ;
melkivöine	adjective_dem ;
metkoine	adjective_vahv ;
metšikkö	adjective ;
mikoine	adjective_vahv ;
moamo(i)toin	adjective_kar ;
muistamatoin	adjective_kielt ;
muju(h)ine	adjective ;
muokempaine	adjective_komp ;
mussaksine	adjective_mod ;
mutkatoin	adjective_kar ;
myöhäisempäine	adjective_komp ;
mäkimys	adjective ;
möltäkköine	adjective_dem ;
naimatoin	adjective_kielt ;
nenimäine	adjective_sup ;
niepsiempäine	adjective_komp ;
niiruvaine	adjective ;
ńoatriehko	adjective_mod ;
ńokatoin	adjective_kar ;
ńuivakkaine	adjective_dem ;
ńurakkaine	adjective_dem ;
nuurumatoin	adjective_kielt ;
näpöine	adjective_vahv ;
näräkkäine	adjective_dem ;
oikiempaine	adjective_komp ;
oiva	adjective_vaill ;
oksatoin	adjective_kar ;
olematoin	adjective_kielt ;
olevaine	adjective_dem ;
omahko	adjective_mod ;
ominaine	adjective ;
ostamatoin	adjective_kielt ;
paimoitoin	adjective_kar ;
pajattamatoin	adjective_kielt ;
pakkaisempaine	adjective_komp ;
parahaine	adjective_dem ;
parahimaine	adjective_sup ;
paras	adjective_sup ;
pariššempi	adjective_komp ;
pariššin	adjective_sup ;
pehmieksine	adjective_mod ;
pehmukkaine	adjective_dem ;
peitotoin	adjective_kar ;
perimäine	adjective_sup ;
perimätöin	adjective_kielt ;
peskukas	adjective ;
peähimäine	adjective_sup ;
peälimäine	adjective_sup ;
pienimäine	adjective_sup ;
pikkaine	adjective_dem ;
pikku	adjective_taipum ;
pikoi	adjective_taipum ;
pisymätöin	adjective_kielt ;
pitkempäine	adjective_komp ;
pitkä(h)ine	adjective_dem ;
plie(š)šine	adjective_dem ;
poahtamatoin	adjective_kielt ;
pohjatoin	adjective_kar ;
pohjimaine	adjective_sup ;
pohooše(n)	adjective_taipum ;
posselennoi	adjective ;
proitimatoin	adjective_kielt ;
putehetoin	adjective_kar ;
pyteräine	adjective_dem ;
pätemätöin	adjective_kielt ;
päterättävä	adjective_mod ;
pöly(h)ine	adjective ;
pötäkempäine	adjective_komp ;
pötäkköine	adjective_dem ;
rantimaine	adjective_sup ;
raviempaine	adjective_komp ;
resoratoin	adjective_kar ;
reunimaine	adjective_sup ;
roakaine	adjective ;
roati	adjective_taipum ;
rotńahko	adjective_mod ;
ruka(a)	adjective_vaill ;
rumempaine	adjective_komp ;
ruokkimatoin	adjective_kielt ;
röpiehkö	adjective_mod ;
sakasnoi	adjective ;
sammaletoin	adjective_kar ;
sanomatoin	adjective_kielt ;
selkiemätöin	adjective_kielt ;
silmätöin	adjective_kar ;
sinnimäine	adjective_sup ;
sloi	adjective ;
smirnoimpaine	adjective_komp ;
sopimatoin	adjective_kielt ;
suitšetoin	adjective_kar ;
sulahko	adjective_mod ;
suorevaine	adjective ;
surmoi	adjective_vaill ;
suurempaine	adjective_komp ;
suvettava	adjective_mod ;
syytöin	adjective_kar ;
syömätöin	adjective_kielt ;
särvimäine	adjective_sup ;
ta(j)imaine	adjective_sup ;
takimaine	adjective_sup ;
tasa	adjective_vaill ;
tietäjys	adjective ;
tinoamatoin	adjective_kielt ;
toampaine	adjective_komp ;
toannimaine	adjective_sup ;
toatotoin	adjective_kar ;
toissa	adjective_taipum ;
tovettšaine	adjective_mod ;
tovooĺen	adjective_taipum ;
tšukuna(h)ine	adjective ;
tšuutompi	adjective_komp ;
tšäpperäine	adjective_mod ;
tulkoine	adjective_vahv ;
turpiempaine	adjective_komp ;
tuu(h)hutoin	adjective_kar ;
tyhjiškö	adjective_mod ;
typpimätöin	adjective_kielt ;
tyynempäine	adjective_komp ;
tännimäine	adjective_sup ;
täpöine	adjective ;
uloimaine	adjective_sup ;
unakempaine	adjective_komp ;
vaivahko	adjective_mod ;
vakavempaine	adjective_komp ;
vakki	adjective_taipum ;
valkoamatoin	adjective_kielt ;
valkoisa	adjective_mod ;
vallatoin	adjective_kar ;
valloikas	adjective ;
vanhempa(h)ine	adjective_komp ;
vanhis	adjective_sup ;
vetriene	adjective_mod ;
veätöin	adjective_kar ;
viima	adjective_taipum ;
viime	adjective_taipum ;
viimi	adjective_taipum ;
viimo(i)	adjective_taipum ;
viisahempaine	adjective_komp ;
viisahus	adjective ;
viljon	adjective_taipum ;
viluhko	adjective_mod ;
voijetoin	adjective_kar ;
voitamatoin	adjective_kielt ;
volakempaine	adjective_komp ;
väinöine	adjective_vahv ;
välimäine	adjective_sup ;
yhtyine	adjective ;
ylempäine	adjective_komp ;
ylimäine	adjective_sup ;
ylin	adjective_sup ;
ylpiettšäine	adjective_mod ;
